District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0716.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Public Service Commission Holdover Period Extension Temporary
Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Paragraph 97(a) of section 8 of An Act Making appropriations to provide for the
expenses of the government of the District of Columbia for the fiscal year ending June thirtieth,
nineteen hundred and fourteen and for other purposes, approved March 4, 1913 (37 Stat. 995;
D.C. Official Code § 34-801), is amended by adding a new subparagraph (3) to read as follows:
“(3) Notwithstanding subparagraph (1) of paragraph 97(a) and section 2(c) of the
Confirmation Act of 1978, effective March 3, 1979 (D.C. Law 2-142; D.C. Official Code § 1-
523.01(c)), a commissioner may serve in a holdover capacity for no longer than 270 days after
expiration of the term to which he or she was appointed.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
(a) This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by
the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
review as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
(b) This act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2